src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON AN_KININFL_MONOG !!= * @CODE@ Lexicon with reduces possessive paradigm: only one wife/husband
!< "+N":i "+AN":m "+Sg":â                             0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > #         ; !generic form
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px1Sg":%^POS                 "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_       ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px2Sg":%^POS                 "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_       ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px3Sg":%^POS                 "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px1Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > PLak      ; ! exclusive Pl
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > PLak      ; ! inclusive Pl
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px2Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > PLak      ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px3Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; ! 3rd person  possessor, hence Pl is -a
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 3rd person  possessor, hence Pl is -a

LEXICON AN_DECL-ATIM	!!= * @CODE@ for atim and mistatim.
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  #         ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak     ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE      ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0         "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; ! ohk
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>        ANABSDECL ;

LEXICON ANPOSS-ATIM !!= * @CODE@ is also there to handle the highly irregular atim and mistatim
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_ ; !Baseform for dep nouns
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;

LEXICON ANVOC !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: # ;

LEXICON AN_KININFL !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;

LEXICON AN_KININFL_PL !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;

LEXICON AN_DIMPOSS !!= * @CODE@ Possessive suffixes to diminutives
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG ; !
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ; !
!+N+AN: ANSUFF_LOC ;

LEXICON AN_KINiyINFL  !!= * @CODE@ Special treatment for kinship nouns ending with -iy - should be done in twolc?
< "+N":î "+AN":m "+Sg":â 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > SG_ ; !generic form
< "+N":î "+AN":m "+Pl":â 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > PLak ; !generic form
+N+AN+Sg: ANiySUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANiySUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:is%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;  

LEXICON AN_DEP_INIT_M !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension
< "+N":0 "+AN":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > ANABLGENERIC ; !Generic form 
+N+AN+Sg:%> ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_PL ;

LEXICON ANABLGENERIC !!= * @CODE@ generic forms Sg, Pl, Loc and diminutives
+Sg: SG_ ;
+Pl: PLak ;
 LOC ;
+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>is%^DIM%> SG_ ;
+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>is%^DIM%> PLak ;


!! !!The declinations for Inanimates

LEXICON INimDECLw_ONESYLL_SG !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, stem -w, poss.-im-, dim. -is, only Sg
< "+N":o "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; ! Adds -o
< "+N":w "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN+Sg:w%>im INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN:w%>im INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:w%> INimDIM-SG ;

LEXICON INimDECL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, poss.-im-, dim. -is
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%>im INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%>im INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%>im INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%> INimDIM ;

LEXICON INimDECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, poss.-im-, dim. -isis
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%>im INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%>im INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%>im INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%> INimDIMisis ;


LEXICON IN_DECL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, Dim: -is- and -isis-
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%> IN_DIM ;

LEXICON IN_DECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, plural Dim: -is- and -isis-
INABSDECL_PL ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%> IN_DIM ;


LEXICON IN_DECLis !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, Dim: -is- 
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%> IN_DIM ;

LEXICON IN_DECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension, Dim: -isis-
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ;


LEXICON IN_DECL_OSI !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate declension of ôsi, an irregular noun
< "+N":s "+IN":i "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":s "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
< "+N":s "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN+Sg:t%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:t%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:t%> INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Der/Dim:t%>is%^DIMis%> IN_DIM ; 


LEXICON IN_DIM !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate diminutives
INABSDECL ;
+N+IN: INSUFF_LOC ;
+N+IN+Sg: INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl: INSUFF_PL ;

LEXICON INABSDECL !!= * @CODE@ for inanimate absolute declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOCahk ; !

LEXICON INABSDECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for inanimate absolute declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOCahk ; !


LEXICON INimDIM !!= * @CODE@ the diminutives with poss.-im-, Dim: -is
< "+N":i "+IN":s 0:%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN:im%^DIMis%> INSUFF_LOC ;
< "+N":i "+IN":s "+Sg":%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":i "+IN":s "+Pl":%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
+N+IN+Sg:im%^DIM%>is INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:im%^DIM%>is INSUFF_PL ;

LEXICON INimDIMisis !!= * @CODE@ the diminutives with poss.-im-, Dim: -isis
< "+N":i "+IN":s 0:%^DIM 0:i 0:s "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN:im%^DIMis%> INSUFF_LOC ;
< "+N":i "+IN":s "+Sg":%^DIM 0:i 0:s "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":i "+IN":s "+Pl":%^DIM  0:i 0:s "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
+N+IN+Sg:im%^DIM%>is INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:im%^DIM%>is INSUFF_PL ;


LEXICON INimDIM-SG !!= * @CODE@ the diminutives with poss.-im-, Dim: -is
< "+N":i "+IN":s 0:%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
+N+IN:im%^DIMis%> INSUFF_LOC ;
< "+N":i "+IN":s "+Sg":%^DIM "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
+N+IN+Sg:im%^DIM%>is INSUFF_SG ;


!! LEXICON IN_DIMDECL Declensions inanimate diminutives, adding +Dim , not in use
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "+Dim":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  # ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0 "+Dim":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLa ; !
!< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Dim":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; !
!+N+IN+Sg+Dim:%> INSUFF_SG ;
!+N+IN+Pl+Dim:%> INSUFF_PL ;
!+N+IN+Dim:%> INSUFF_LOC ;

LEXICON INDEP-DERIV_M_SG !!= * @CODE@  for hardcoded noun:diminutive for inalienables
+N+IN+Der/Dim:  IN_DEP_INIT_M ;

LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension, plural lemmas
IN_DEP_INIT_M ;

LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > INABLGENERIC ; !Generic form 
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;


LEXICON INABLGENERIC !!= * @CODE@ generic forms Sg, Pl, Loc and diminutives
+Sg: SG_ ;
+Pl: PLa ;
 LOC ;
+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg:%>is%^DIM%> SG_ ;
+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl:%>is%^DIM%> PLa ;

LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM !!= * @CODE@ for the inanimate possessive declension
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_ ; !Generic form 
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Pl":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > PLa ; !Generic form 
< "+N":0 "+IN":0  "@U.noun.abs@" > LOC ; 
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;
+N+IN+Pl:%> INSUFF_PL ;
+N+IN:%> INSUFF_LOC ;


LEXICON IN_DEP_INIT_M_SG !!= * @CODE@ inanimate possessive declension, only Sg
< "+N":0 "+IN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > # ; !Baseform for dep nouns OBS!
+N+IN+Sg:%> INSUFF_SG ;

!! !!Animate possessive suffixes
