src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON STEMLIST
kîkisepâ IN_DECLisis "morning" ;
wayasit IN_DECLis "hoof" ; !yaml !possibly -is in Dim
anâskânâhtikwa:anâskânâhtikw IN_DECL_PL "floor boards, flooring" ; ! plural 
astisêwakwa:astisêwakw IN_DECL_PL "lengthwise muscles on back" ; ! plural 
atim:têm ANPOSS-ATIM "dog-possessed" ; !
ayêhkwêwatim:ayêhkwêwatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "castrated horse (gelding) or dog" ;
âhkosiwinis IN_DIM "minor illness" ;
âhpin-ôsi:âhpin-ô IN_DECL_OSI "rawhide boat" ; ! singular; plural: âhpin-ôsa  NI-4
âmow-mêyi INimDECL "honey" ; ! singular  NI-4
âpakosîsi-pîway IN_DECL "mouse fur" ;
êyihkwêwatim:êyihkwêwatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "gelding" ;
iskwêcihcîs IN_DIM "little finger; literally: last finger" ;
kaskitêwatim:kaskitêwatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "dark horse, black horse, black dog" ;
kihci-mihti INimDECL "big club, big stick" ; ! singular; plural: kihci-mihta  NI-4
kihcikamîwaskwa:kihcikamîwaskw IN_DECL_PL "bullrushes" ; ! plural 
kimiwan IN_DECL "rain" ; ! singular converted from VII kimiwan- for use as noun
kotiskâwêwatim:kotiskâwêwatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "race-horse" ;
macwêwês IN_DIM "repeating gun, machine gun" ;
maskawihkomân IN_DECL "strong knife" ;
maskisin IN_DECLis "moccasin; shoe" ; ! singular also NA-1 in some dialects
mêyi INimDECL "stool, excrement, dung, manure" ; ! singular; plural: mêya  NI-4
mihko:mihk INimDECLw_ONESYLL_SG "blood" ; ! singular, mass noun 
misatim:misatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "horse" ;
miywâpin IN_DECL "pleasing sight" ;
mîcimâpôs IN_DIM "soup" ;
nânikaskwa:nânikaskw IN_DECL_PL "broad hay, broad expanse of hay, a meadow of hay" ; ! plural 
nêkâ ANVOC "(My) mother (A call for her)" ; ! From NS 152
nôhtâ ANVOC "(my) Father (a call for him)" ; ! From NS 152
ocikana IN_DECL "beaver food (provisions for winter)" ; ! plural 
osk-âyi INimDECL "new thing, young creature" ; ! singular; plural: osk-âya  NI-4
oskayiwinis IN_DIM "new article of clothing" ; ! singular, diminutive plural generally
oski-ôsi:oski-ô IN_DECL_OSI "new boat" ; ! singular; plural: oski-ôsa  NI-4
ôkîkwa:ôkîkw IN_DECL_PL "gills (of fish)" ; ! plural 
ôsi:ô IN_DECL_OSI "boat; canoe" ; ! singular; plural: ôsa cf. 1sPoss: nitôt; locative: ôtihk NI-4
pihêwayasit IN_DECLis "club (at cards)" ; ! singular pihêw osit prairie chicken's foot
pihko:pihk INimDECLw_ONESYLL_SG "soot, ashes, wood ashes, dust" ; ! singular, mass noun 
pimiskanaw IN_DECL "trail, tracks [e.g. left by a person or animal]" ;
pitikwayasit IN_DECLis "club foot" ;
pîswê-maskisin IN_DECLis "felt, woollen boot liner" ;
pîswêsâkâs IN_DIM "sweater" ;
sîsîp-wâwi INimDECL "duck egg" ; ! singular; plural: sîsîp-wâwa  NI-4
sôsowatim:sôsowatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "mule" ;
tîwipakwa:tîwipakw IN_DECL_PL "tea leaves (after infusion)" ; ! plural plural generally
tohtôsâpoy INimDECLisis "milk" ;
waskway-ôsi:waskway-ô IN_DECL_OSI "birch bark canoe" ; ! singular; plural: waskway-ôsa  NI-4
wâkâyôsi-wâti INimDECL "bear den" ; ! singular; plural: wâkâyôsi-wâta  NI-4
wâpatim:wâpatimw AN_DECL-ATIM "white dog" ;
wêpinamâtowin IN_DECL "a game of throwing a ball back and forth" ;
wîko:wîk INimDECLw_ONESYLL_SG "kidney fat" ; ! singular, mass noun 
wîni INimDECL "bone-marrow; his/her bone-marrow" ; ! singular, mass noun  NI-4
nimosô ANVOC "grandfather (a call for him)" ; !  
LEXICON DEP-M-LIST
maniway:aniway IN_DEP_INIT_M_SG "cheek" ; !yaml !!= @CODE@	
micihciy:icihcîsis INDEP-DERIV_M_SG "hand" ; 
mihcawakâs:ihcawakâs IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM "little ear" ;
mihkwâkanis:ihkwâkanis IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM "face" ;
miscikwânis:iscikwânis IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM "little head" ;
misicis:isicis IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM "small foot" ;
mîscakâsa:îscakâs IN_DEP_INIT_M_PL "hair" ; !NS152 PL
mêscakâsa:êscakâs IN_DEP_INIT_M_PL "hair" ; !Wolv PL
miskât:iskât IN_DEP_INIT_M "leg" ; 
micônis:icônis IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM "small hand" ;
mahkwanikan:ahkwanikan IN_DEP_INIT_M "heelbone" ;
miciskêyâpiy:iciskêyâpiy IN_DEP_INIT_M ;
miskanis:iskanis IN_DEP_INIT_M_DIM ;
miskâhtikwanikan:iskâhtikwanikan IN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitahtahkwan:itahtahkwan IN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitiy:itiy IN_DEP_INIT_M ;
micohcôsimis:icohcôsimis AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitakikom:itakikom AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitâs:itâs AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitêskan:itêskan AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitihtihkosiw:itihtihkosiw AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitisowayak:itisowayak AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
mitohtôsim:itohtôsim AN_DEP_INIT_M ;
